Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Joint Permitting Council is established within the office of the Gov-
ernor. The council consists of the following members appointed by the Governor:
(a) One representative of each of the following agencies:
(A) The Department of Transportation.
(B) The Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(C) The State Department of Energy.
(D) The Department of State Lands.
(E) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) The Water Resources Department.
(G) The State Department of Agriculture.
(H) The Oregon Business Development Department.
(I) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(J) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(K) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(b) Two members with knowledge and experience in economic development.
(2) The term of office of each  member of the council is four years. A member serves at
the pleasure of the Governor. Before  the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor
shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1 of the following year. A member
may be reappointed. If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) A member of the council  is not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses.
(4) The council shall elect one of its  members as chairperson and another as vice chair-
person, for the terms and with  the duties and powers necessary for the performance of the
functions of such offices as the council determines.
(5) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for  the transaction
of business.
(6) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the  chairperson or a majority
of the members of the council.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 1
(7) The council may employ staff, including but not limited to a permitting specialist.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Joint Permitting Council established in  section 1 of this 2026 Act
shall administer a fast track permitting program that allows eligible projects to obtain  ex-
pedited regulatory approval from state agencies.
(2) The council shall establish eligibility criteria for the fast track permitting  program.
The criteria must require a project to:
(a)(A) Exceed $100 million in capital investment, if  the project is located within the urban
growth boundary of a metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268;
(B) Exceed $50 million in capital investment, if the project is not located within the urban
growth boundary of a metropolitan service district organized under  ORS chapter 268 or
within a nonurban county as described in ORS 653.026; or
(C) Exceed  $25 million in capital investment, if the project is located within a nonurban
county as described in ORS 653.026;
(b) Require more than one regulatory approval from one state agency,  or more than one
regulatory approval from more than one state agency;
(c) Advance job creation or growth in  gross domestic product through a target industry
cluster, as defined by the Oregon Business Development Department by rule;
(d) Meet readiness criteria established by the council;
(e) Demonstrate land use compatibility;
(f) Not require renewals of existing permits; and
(g) Meet other requirements established by the council.
(3)(a) An applicant for the fast track  permitting program shall submit a project applica-
tion to the council. The council shall:
(A) Review the application to determine if the project meets the eligibility  criteria es-
tablished under subsection (2) of this section and report the findings to the Governor; and
(B) Forward the application to the Regional  Solutions Program created under ORS
284.754.
(b) The Regional Solutions Program shall review the project,  for consistency with re-
gional economic development  priorities as established under ORS 284.754, Comprehensive
Economic Development Strategies or  other similar sources, and report to the Governor with
a recommendation about whether to advance the  project. The report may include additional
local or regional dynamics for the Governor to consider.
(c) The Governor shall review each application forwarded by the  council and the Regional
Solutions Program and determine whether to approve the application.
(d) The Governor may  not approve an application if there are 15 projects currently in
progress under the fast track permitting program.
(4) If the Governor approves a project application  for the fast track permitting program,
the council shall:
(a) Develop and approve a cooperative project plan for the project that:
(A) Includes intermediate and final completion dates for all state regulatory approvals;
(B) Provides for a shorter timeline than existing timelines for permitting or  other rele-
vant timelines for permitting established through policy, law or regulation; and
(C) Is consistent with analyses completed by the  regulating agencies identifying oppor-
tunities to streamline the  approval process for the permit, eliminate any unnecessary steps
or barriers, reduce the incidence of incomplete  applications and eliminate any obsolete or
unnecessary approval processes.
(b) Identify a lead agency that will provide monthly updates  on the project to the council.
(c) Include in the plan any other elements deemed necessary by the council.
(5) The council shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Oregon  Depart-
ment of Administrative Services that describes the status of each project administered in the
previous year under the fast track permitting program.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 2
SECTION 3. (1) The Governor  shall appoint the members of the Joint Permitting Council
under section 1 of this 2026 Act no later than July 1, 2026.
(2) The Joint  Permitting Council shall establish eligibility criteria for the fast track per-
mitting program, including readiness criteria, under section 2 of this 2026  Act no later than
October 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 5. (1) This section applies to the following agencies and offices:
(a) The Department of Transportation.
(b) The Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(c) The State Department of Energy.
(d) The Department of State Lands.
(e) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(f) The Water Resources Department.
(g) The State Department of Agriculture.
(h) The office of the State Historic Preservation Officer.
(2) As used in this section, “permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.700.
(3) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of this 2026 Act, an agency shall
publish a catalog of permits issued by the agency that are related  to or have an impact on
economic development projects. For each permit issued by the agency that  is related to or
has an impact on economic development projects, the catalog must include:
(a) A description of the permit.
(b) The duration of the permit.
(c) The statutory authority, regulatory authority  or other authority for issuing the per-
mit.
(d) The method by which  the agency processes incomplete applications for permits and,
if readily available,  the annual number of incomplete applications an agency generally re-
ceives.
(e) Any statutory,  regulatory or other authority governing the time within which the
agency must process applications for the permit.
(f) The application fee for the permit, the statutory, regulatory or other authority for the
application fee and when the amount of the application fee was last changed.
(g) An  analysis identifying opportunities to streamline the approval process for the per-
mit, eliminate any unnecessary steps or barriers, reduce the incidence  of incomplete appli-
cations and eliminate any obsolete or unnecessary approval processes.
(h) The approximate number of applications for the permit currently pending at  the
agency and a statement of whether a backlog exists.
(4) Not later  than 120 days after the effective date of this 2026 Act, an agency shall report
to the Governor on:
(a) Permitting programs in the agency that are  not meeting reasonable processing
timelines.
(b) Opportunities to streamline and improve  permit processing and meet reasonable
processing timelines.
(c) Suggestions obtained from consultation with permit applicants on permit processing.
(d) Opportunities to provide fee relief for delayed permit processing.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 7.  ORS 285C.090 is amended to read:
285C.090. (1) An enterprise zone must be located  in a local area in which , on the basis of ev-
idence provided by the cities, counties or ports designating the enterprise zone, the Oregon
Business Development Department determines that the area demonstrates  a need for eco-
nomic development due to :
[(a) Fifty  percent or more of the households have incomes below 80 percent of the median income
of this state, as defined by the most recent federal decennial census; ]
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 3
[(b) The unemployment rate is at least 2.0 percentage points greater than the comparable  unem-
ployment rate for this entire state, as defined by the most recently available data published or  officially
provided and verified by the United  States Government, the Employment Department, the Portland
State University Population Research Center or special studies conducted under a contract with a  re-
gional academic institution; or ]
[(c) The Oregon Business  Development Department determines on a case-by-case basis using evi-
dence provided by the cities, counties or ports designating the  enterprise zone that there exists a level
of economic hardship at least as severe  as that described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
The evidence must be based on the most recently available data from official sources and may  include
a contemporary  decline of the population in the enterprise zone, the percentage of persons in the en-
terprise zone below the poverty level relative to the percentage of the entire population of this state
below the poverty level or the unemployment rate for the county  or counties in which the enterprise
zone is located. ]
(a) Evidence of economic transition or  restructuring, including but not limited to job
losses, industry contraction,  supply chain realignment, automation impacts and shifts in re-
gional economic specialization;
(b) The presence of  underutilized, vacant or redevelopment-ready industrial or employ-
ment land, including brownfields, legacy industrial sites and properties requiring moderniza-
tion to support productive use;
(c) Alignment  with adopted local, regional or statewide economic development strategies,
land-use plans, infrastructure plans, workforce strategies  or climate and energy transition
goals, where enterprise zone designation would materially advance implementation;
(d) Demonstrated opportunity to:
(A) Support emerging, traded sector or innovation-driven industries;
(B) Retain, reinvest in or modernize existing industries or facilities; or
(C) Make investments that improve productivity, competitiveness,  supply chain resilience
or workforce quality;
(e) Commitment  by the zone sponsor to a performance-based development approach, in-
cluding measurable objectives  related to capital investment, wages, workforce development,
retention or  modernization outcomes, productivity improvement, redevelopment outcomes
or other economic performance indicators established by the Oregon Business  Development
Department by rule; or
(f) Other community-defined  indicators of economic need or development potential sup-
ported by objective evidence and consistent with department rules.
(2)(a) An urban enterprise zone may consist of a total area of not more than  12 square miles in
size.
(b) A rural enterprise zone may  consist of a total area of not more than 15 square miles in size.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, the area of the  zone must be calculated by excluding that
portion of the zone that lies below the ordinary high water mark of a navigable body of water.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) An urban enterprise zone must have 12 miles or less, and a  rural enterprise zone must have
15 miles or less, as the greatest distance between any two points within the zone; and
(b) Unconnected areas of an enterprise zone may not be more than five miles apart.
(4) Unconnected areas of a rural enterprise zone may not be more than  15 miles apart when an
unconnected area is entirely within a sparsely populated county, and the zone:
(a) Must have 20 miles or less  as the greatest distance between any two points within the zone,
if only a portion of the zone is contained within a sparsely populated county; or
(b) Must have 25 miles or less  as the greatest distance between any two points within the zone,
if the zone is entirely contained within a sparsely populated county.
(5) This section does not apply to  the designation or redesignation of a reservation enterprise
zone or a reservation partnership zone.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 285C.135 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 4
285C.135. (1) To be an eligible business firm, a business firm must be engaged, or proposing  to
engage, within the enterprise zone, in :
(a) The business of providing goods, products or services to  businesses or other organizations
through activities including, but not limited  to, manufacturing, assembly, fabrication, processing,
shipping or storage[ .]; or
(b) An industry sector identified by resolution of the governing body of  the zone sponsor
as a priority industry under a local or regional economic development strategy.
(2) A business firm is not an eligible business firm if the firm is:
(a) Engaged within the enterprise  zone in the business of providing goods, products or services
to the general public for personal or household use.
(b) Significantly engaged in a business activity  within the enterprise zone that consists of retail
sales or services,  child care, housing, retail food service, health care, tourism, entertainment, fi-
nancial services, professional services, leasing  space to others, property management, construction
or other similar activities, even if for another business or organization.
(c) Significantly engaged in operating a fulfillment center within the enterprise zone from which
deliveries are made to retail purchasers within, or in the region surrounding, the enterprise zone.
(3)(a) If  a business firm described in subsection (2) of this section engages in an activity de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the business firm is an eligible business firm if  the activity
is performed at a location that is separate from the activity  of the firm that is described in sub-
section (2) of this section. Property at  the location at which the firm conducts an activity described
in subsection (2) of this section may not be exempt under ORS 285C.175.
(b)(A) Upon written request of the zone sponsor demonstrating that  the business activity
will provide substantial community benefit, innovation or alignment  with local economic de-
velopment goals, the Oregon Business Development Department may approve a  waiver or
authorize a pilot program allowing a business firm engaged  in a business activity described
in subsection (2) of this section to qualify as an eligible business firm.
(B) The Oregon Business Development Department shall adopt rules that  establish ap-
proval criteria for waivers or pilot programs for purposes of this paragraph.
[(4) Two or more business firms that otherwise meet the requirements of this section may elect to
be treated as one eligible business firm if 100 percent of  the equity interest in the business firms is
owned by the same person or persons, or if one of the  business firms owns 100 percent of the equity
interest of the other or others. ]
[(5)] (4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to  (3) of this section, each of the following business
firms is an eligible business firm under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A business firm engaged in the activity  of providing a retail or financial service within the
enterprise zone if:
(A) The activity serves  customers by responding to orders or requests received only by tele-
phone, computer, the Internet or similar means of telecommunications; and
(B) Not less than 90 percent of the customers or orders are located and  originate in an area
from which long  distance telephone charges, in the absence of a toll-free number, would apply if the
order were placed by telephone.
(b) A business firm that operates a facility  within the enterprise zone that serves statewide,
regional, national or global operations of the firm  through administrative, design, financial, man-
agement, marketing or other activities, without regard to the relationship of these activities to  any
otherwise eligible activities within the enterprise zone.
(c) A business firm that operates a hotel, motel or destination  resort in the enterprise zone if
the sponsor has elected under ORS 285C.070 to treat a business  firm engaged in hotel, motel or
destination resort operations in an enterprise zone as an eligible business firm.
(d) A business  firm that is engaged in electronic commerce if the enterprise zone has been des-
ignated for electronic commerce under ORS 285C.095.
(5) Two or more business firms that otherwise meet the requirements of this section
may elect to be treated as one eligible business firm if 100 percent of the equity  interest in
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 5
the business firms is owned by the same person or persons, or if one of the  business firms
owns 100 percent of the equity interest of the other or others.
SECTION 9.  ORS 285C.160 is amended to read:
285C.160. (1) (a) An eligible business firm seeking authorization under ORS 285C.140 and the
sponsor of the enterprise zone in which the firm intends to invest may enter into a  written agree-
ment to extend the  period during which the qualified property is exempt from taxation [ under ORS
285C.175 if the firm  complies with the terms of the agreement ] beyond the three years allowable
under ORS 285C.175.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the exemption period may not be
extended under this section for qualified property used in operating a data center.
(2) The period for which the exemption for the  qualified property is to [ continue to be exempt ]
be extended:
(a) Must be set forth in the agreement ; and
(b) May not exceed [ two additional tax years for which a school  support fee must be paid in ac-
cordance with ORS 285C.162. ]:
(A) Two additional tax years,  subject to any applicable school support fee requirements
under ORS 285C.162; or
(B) If requested by the sponsoring jurisdiction, a longer period of no more than 10  years
if, under rules adopted by the Oregon Business Development  Department, the eligible busi-
ness firm demonstrates that the project to  which the agreement relates involves substantial
capital investment, regional economic impact or alignment with local development goals.
(3) In order for an agreement [ under this section ] to extend the period of exemption under this
section, the agreement must be executed on or before the date  on which the firm is authorized, and:
(a) If the enterprise zone is a rural enterprise zone or an urban enterprise zone located inside
a metropolitan statistical area of fewer than 400,000 residents, the agreement  must require that the
firm:
(A)(i) Annually compensate all new employees hired by the firm at an average rate of  at least
150 percent of the county  average annual wage for each assessment year during the tax exemption
period, as determined at the time of authorization; or
(ii) If the enterprise zone is located in  a qualified rural county, annually compensate all new
employees hired by the firm at an average rate of at least 130 percent of the county average  annual
wage for each assessment year during the tax exemption period, as determined at the time of au-
thorization; and
(B) Meet any additional requirement that the sponsor may reasonably request.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the  average wage received by the newly
hired employees must equal or exceed 100 percent of the average wage in the county.
(c) If the enterprise zone is an urban enterprise zone located inside a  metropolitan statistical
area of  400,000 residents or more, the agreement must require that the firm meet any additional
requirement the sponsor may reasonably require.
(4) If a firm  enters into an agreement under this section that includes a compensation require-
ment under subsection (3)(a)(A) of this section and the firm subsequently submits one  or more
statements of continued  intent under ORS 285C.165, notwithstanding the terms of the agreement
made under this section, for each  statement of continued intent submitted, the county average an-
nual wage under subsection (3)(a)(A) of this section shall be  adjusted to a level that is current with
the statement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 285C.200 is amended to read:
285C.200. (1) The qualified property of an authorized business firm may be  exempt from property
taxation under ORS 285C.175 only if the firm meets the following qualifications:
(a) The  firm is an eligible business firm engaged in eligible business operations under ORS
285C.135 that are located inside the enterprise zone;
(b) The firm owns or leases qualified property that is located inside the enterprise zone;
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 6
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and  ORS 285C.203, the em-
ployment of the firm, on or before the earlier of April 1 or the date on which the  initial exemption
claim is filed under ORS 285C.220, following the year in which the qualified  property is first placed
in service in the enterprise zone, is not less than the greater of:
(A) 110 percent of the annual average employment of the firm; or
(B) The annual average employment of the firm plus one employee;
(d) The firm does not diminish employment outside the enterprise zone  as provided in subsection
[(4) or ] (5) or (6) of this section;
(e) The firm does not substantially curtail operations within the  enterprise zone as described in
ORS 285C.210; and
(f) The firm complies in all material respects with local,  Oregon and federal laws applicable to
the firm’s operations inside the enterprise zone since the application for authorization  and
throughout the period of exemption, as prescribed by rule.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the sponsor and the  business firm
may agree to flexible hiring timelines, including phased or delayed hiring, if  the firm dem-
onstrates to the sponsor’s satisfaction  a clear plan for meeting employment or alternative
performance criteria, including but not limited to job  retention, improvements in productiv-
ity and revenue growth, over the course of the exemption period.
(b) In lieu of meeting  the employment qualifications under subsection (1)(c) of this sec-
tion, a sponsor may approve alternative performance criteria that support the objectives of
the zone designation, including but not limited to job retention or wage growth.
(c) The terms agreed to under this subsection must be set  forth in a written agreement.
Failure to meet the terms of the agreement is a disqualifying event under ORS 285C.240.
(d) This subsection does not apply with respect to qualified property of an authorized
business firm used in operating a data center.
[(2)] (3) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(c) or  (e) of this section, an eligible business firm may
meet the qualifications of this section if the firm has satisfied the following requirements:
(a) The firm is  authorized subject to ORS 285C.155 and the firm satisfies those requirements; and
(b)(A) The firm completes an investment of $25 million or more in qualified property; or
(B) The firm fulfills the requirements of ORS 285C.205 and the employment of  the firm does not
decrease below the annual average employment of the firm.
[(3)] (4) An authorized business firm that engages in both eligible and ineligible operations in
an enterprise zone and is an eligible business firm because of ORS 285C.135 (3)  meets the quali-
fications of this section if:
(a) The eligible operations of the firm under ORS  285C.135 meet the qualifications of this sec-
tion; and
(b) The employees of the firm  work a majority of their time in eligible operations within the
enterprise zone.
[(4)] (5) A business firm does not meet the qualifications of this section  if the firm or any other
firm under common control closes or permanently curtails operations in another part of the state
more than 30 miles from the nearest boundary  of the enterprise zone in which the firm seeks a
property tax exemption. This subsection applies to the transfer of any  of the business firm’s eligible
operations to the enterprise zone from another part of the state,  if the closure or permanent
curtailment in the other part of the state diminished employment in the  county and more local labor
markets after authorization and on or before December 31 of the first tax year for  which any qual-
ified property of the firm in that zone would otherwise be exempt under ORS 285C.175.
[(5)] (6) An authorized business firm that moves any of  its employees from a site or sites within
30 miles from the nearest boundary of  the enterprise zone after authorization may meet the quali-
fications under this section if the  employment of the firm has been increased within the zone and
at the  site or sites from which the employees were transferred, no later than April 1 preceding the
first tax year for which qualified property of the firm is exempt under ORS 285C.175, to not less than
110 percent of the annual average employment of the firm within the zone and the site or sites from
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 7
which the  employees were transferred, calculated over the 12 months preceding the date of appli-
cation for authorization.
[(6)] (7) For purposes of subsection (1)(f) of this section, the Oregon Business  Development De-
partment shall adopt rules  that define the effect of noncompliance on an eligible business firm’s
continuing exemption in an enterprise zone and that indicate what is necessary  to establish the
noncompliance in terms of materiality of the relevant violation, the finality  of applicable legal or
regulatory proceedings and judgments involving  the firm, the failure by the firm to perform or sub-
mit to remedial or curative actions and similar factors.
[(7)] (8) As used in this section:
(a) “Annual average employment of the firm” means the average employment of the  firm, cal-
culated over the 12 months preceding the date of application for authorization.
(b) Except as provided in subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, “employment of the firm” means:
(A) The number of employees working for the firm a majority of their  time in eligible operations
at locations throughout the enterprise zone; or
(B) In the case of a firm described in ORS 285C.135 [ (5)(b)] (4)(b) , the number of employees
working  a  majority of their time at the facility in the enterprise zone for which authorization was
obtained.
SECTION 11.  ORS 285C.140 is amended to read:
285C.140. (1)(a) Any eligible business  firm seeking to have property exempt from property taxa-
tion under ORS 285C.175 shall,  before the commencement of direct site preparation activities or the
construction, addition, modification or  installation of qualified property in an enterprise zone, and
before the hiring of eligible employees, apply for authorization under this section.
(b) The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the Department of  Revenue and the
Oregon Business Development Department.
(c) The application shall be filed with the  sponsor of the zone. A sponsor may require that the
application filed with the sponsor be accompanied by a filing fee. If required, the filing  fee may not
exceed the greater of $200 or one-tenth of one percent of the value  of the investment in qualified
property that is proposed in the application for authorization. The filing fee may be required for the
filing of applications only after the sponsor adopts  a policy, consistent with Oregon Business De-
velopment Department rules, authorizing the imposition of the filing fee.
(2) The application shall contain the following information:
(a) A description  of the nature of the firm’s current and proposed business operations inside the
boundary of the enterprise zone;
(b) A  description and estimated value of the qualified property to be constructed, added, modi-
fied or installed inside the boundary of the enterprise zone;
(c) The number of employees of the firm  that the firm employs within the enterprise zone, av-
eraged over  the previous 12 months, and an estimate of the number of employees that the firm will
hire;
(d) A commitment  to meet all requirements of ORS 285C.200 and 285C.215, and to verify com-
pliance with these requirements;
(e) A commitment to satisfy all additional conditions for authorization that  are imposed by the
enterprise zone sponsor under  ORS 285C.150, 285C.155 or 285C.205 or pursuant to an agreement
entered into under ORS 285C.160, and to verify compliance with these additional conditions;
(f) A commitment to renew the  application, consistent with ORS 285C.165, every two years while
the zone exists if the firm has not filed a claim  under ORS 285C.220 that is based on the application;
and
(g) Any other information considered necessary by the  Department of Revenue and the Oregon
Business Development Department.
(3) After  an application is submitted to a sponsor, the business firm may revise or amend the
application. An amendment or revision may not  be made on or after January 1 of the first assess-
ment year for which the qualified property associated with the application is  exempt under ORS
285C.175.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 8
(4) If an application for  authorization appears to be complete and the proposed investment ap-
pears to be eligible for authorization, the  sponsor and the business firm shall conduct a preauthor-
ization conference. The assessor of the county in which the property  will be located shall be timely
notified and have the option to participate in the conference. The conference shall:
(a) Identify issues with the potential to affect compliance with relevant exemption  requirements,
including but not limited to enterprise zone boundary amendments;
(b) Arrange for methods and procedures  to establish and verify compliance with applicable re-
quirements; and
(c) Identify the person who is obligated to notify  the county assessor if requirements are not
satisfied.
(5) Upon completion of the preauthorization conference required under subsection (4) of  this
section, the sponsor shall prepare a written summary of the conference, attach the summary  to the
application and forward the application to the county assessor for review.
(6) Following the preauthorization conference under subsection (4) of  this section, the sponsor
and the county assessor shall authorize the business firm by approving the  application, if the spon-
sor and county assessor determine that:
(a) The current  or proposed operations of the business firm in the enterprise zone result in the
firm being eligible under ORS 285C.135; and
(b) The firm has made the commitments and provided the other information required  under
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) If the business firm seeking authorization  is an eligible business firm described in ORS
285C.135 [ (5)(b)] (4)(b), the sponsor must, as a condition of approving the application, make a formal
finding that the business firm is an eligible business firm under ORS 285C.135 and that the size of
the proposed investment, the employment at the facility  of the firm or the nature of the activities
to be undertaken by the  firm within the enterprise zone will significantly enhance the local econ-
omy, promote the purposes for which the zone was created and increase employment  within the
zone.
(8) The approval of both the sponsor and the county assessor under  this section shall be prima
facie evidence that the qualified property of  the business firm will receive the property tax ex-
emption under ORS 285C.175. In approving the application, the sponsor and  county assessor shall
provide proof of approval as directed by the Oregon Business Development Department.
(9) If the sponsor  or county assessor fails or refuses to authorize the business firm, the business
firm may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404 to 305.560.  The business firm shall
provide copies of the firm’s appeal to the sponsor, county assessor, the Department of Revenue  and
the Oregon Business Development Department.
(10) Authorization under this section does not ensure that property constructed, added, modified
or installed by the authorized business firm will receive property tax exemption under  ORS
285C.175. The sponsor and  the county assessor are not liable in any way if the Department of Re-
venue or the county assessor later determines that an authorized business firm does not satisfy  the
requirements for an exemption on qualified property.
(11) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if an eligible business firm has begun  or
completed the construction, addition, modification or installation of property that  meets the quali-
fications of ORS 285C.180, and the property has not  yet been subject to property tax after having
been placed in service, then, for purposes of ORS  285C.050 to 285C.250, the firm shall be authorized
under this section if the firm files  an application that is allowed under subsection (12) of this section
and is otherwise authorized under this section.
(12) Late submission of an application under this section is allowed if:
(a) A rule permits late submissions of applications under this section; or
(b) The Department of Revenue waives filing deadline requirements under  this section. The de-
partment shall issue a letter to the eligible business firm and zone sponsor setting forth the  waiver
under this paragraph.
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 9
SECTION 11a. Section 11b of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 285C.050
to 285C.250.
SECTION 11b. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an eligible business  firm may
not be authorized under ORS 285C.140 with respect to property consisting of a data center
project before the date that is 90 days following the date on which the  2027 regular session
of the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
SECTION 11c.
Section 11b of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 12.  ORS 285C.180 is amended to read:
285C.180. (1) The following types of property are qualified for exemption under ORS 285C.175:
(a) A newly constructed building or structure.
(b) A new addition to or modification of an existing building or structure.
(c) Any real property machinery or equipment or personal property, whether new, used  or re-
conditioned, that is installed on property that is owned or  leased by an authorized business firm,
and:
(A) Newly purchased or leased  by the firm, unless the property is described in ORS 285C.175
(4)(a); or
(B) Newly transferred into the enterprise zone  from outside the county within which the site
of the firm is located and installed.
(2) Property described in subsection (1) of this section is qualified under this section only if:
(a) The property meets  or exceeds the minimum cost requirements established under ORS
285C.185;
(b) The property satisfies applicable  usage, lease or location requirements established under
ORS 285C.185;
(c) The property was constructed, added, modified or installed to further  the production of in-
come;
(d) The property is owned or leased by an authorized business firm;
(e) The location of the property corresponds to the location as set forth  in the application for
authorization of the  business firm and consists of a single site or multiple sites adjacent to or having
comparable proximity to each other, within the boundaries of the enterprise zone;
(f) The property is the  same general type of property as described in the application for au-
thorization; and
(g) In the case  of an eligible business firm described in ORS 285C.135 [ (5)(b)] (4)(b), the actual
investment at the facility of the firm is consistent with the description set forth in  the application
for authorization.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the following property is not qualified  for
exemption under ORS 285C.175:
(a) Land.
(b) Property that was  not in use or occupancy for more than a 180-day period that ends during
the preceding assessment year.
(c) On-site developments that, consistent with ORS 307.010, are assessed as land.
(d) Noninventory supplies, including but not limited to lubricants.
(e) Any operator-driven item  of machinery or equipment or any vehicle, if the item or vehicle
moves by internal motorized power. An item or vehicle described in this paragraph includes but  is
not limited to an item or vehicle that moves within an enclosed space.
(f) Any device or rolling  stock that is pulled, pushed or carried by a vehicle that is suitable as
a mode of transportation beyond the enterprise zone boundary.
(4) Subsection (3)(b) of this section does not  apply to the first assessment year for which the
property is exempt under ORS 285C.175.
(5) For purposes of this section and ORS 285C.175, property includes any portion or incremental
unit of property  that is newly constructed or installed, or that is a new addition to or modification
of an existing building or structure.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 285C.155 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 10
285C.155. For purposes of ORS 285C.200 [ (2)] (3):
(1) The sponsor of an enterprise zone, at the time authorization is sought  by a business firm
under ORS 285C.140, shall establish a minimum number of employees the firm must maintain in the
enterprise zone throughout the exemption period.
(2) The sponsor, at the time authorization is sought by a  business firm under ORS 285C.140, may
establish other reasonable conditions with which the firm must comply in order for  qualified prop-
erty of the firm to be exempt under ORS 285C.175.
(3) Employment requirements and other conditions established by the sponsor under this section
shall be set forth in a resolution adopted by the governing body of  the sponsor at the time the
sponsor approves the application of the business firm for authorization under ORS 285C.140.
(4) A resolution adopted pursuant  to this section may be modified at the request of the business
firm at any time prior to the  start of the first tax year for which an exemption under ORS 285C.175
is claimed.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 285C.205 is amended to read:
285C.205. The  requirements of ORS 285C.200 [ (2)(b)(B)] (3)(b)(B) are met if the qualified business
firm does all of the following:
(1) The firm demonstrates at least a 10 percent increase in productivity no later than  18 months
following January 1 of the first assessment year  for which an exemption under ORS 285C.175 is
claimed. Unless further specified by the sponsor  of the enterprise zone through the resolution
adopted under ORS 285C.155:
(a) The  increase must be in business operations of the firm that are using qualified property
receiving the exemption;
(b) Productivity is  measured by dividing physical units or quantity of output by the number of
labor hours engaged in the operations that produced the physical units or quantity of output; and
(c) The base level of productivity shall be established over a minimum 12-month period preceding
the date on which the qualified property is placed in service.
(2) The firm maintains or exceeds the 10 percent increase  in productivity under subsection (1)
of this section as an annual average rate for each subsequent assessment year during the  remainder
of the exemption period.
(3) On or  before April 1 of each of the first three assessment years for which an exemption is
claimed, the firm deposits into an account established by the sponsor an amount equal to  25 percent
of the estimated tax savings arising from the exemption for that year. The sponsor may adopt addi-
tional specifications or requirements applicable to this subsection in the resolution  the sponsor
adopts under ORS 285C.155. Consistent with this subsection and any additional specifications or
requirements adopted by the sponsor:
(a) For up to 30 months following the relevant April 1 date  for which a deposit is made, the firm
may draw from the  account amounts equal to any expense incurred for training or retraining em-
ployees to promote or  facilitate productivity increases under this section, except that the total
amount withdrawn from the account for that deposit may not exceed $3,500 per trained employee;
(b) Any amount attributable to  the deposit that remains in the account after the 30-month period
in which firm withdrawals may be made under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall  be transferred
to a special fund for use by local publicly funded job training providers; and
(c) No more than 18 months after the deposit, the estimated  tax savings on which the deposit
was based shall be reconciled with the actual tax savings arising from the exemption. The  recon-
ciliation shall be accomplished by the firm immediately making a further  deposit into the account
to cover any shortfall or by being reimbursed from  the account for any surplus. A deposit or re-
imbursement made pursuant to this paragraph does not affect withdrawals  or transfers that occur
as a result of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 285C.210 is amended to read:
285C.210. (1) For purposes of ORS 285C.175, 285C.200 and 285C.240, except as  provided in sub-
section (3) of this section, operations of a business firm  within the enterprise zone are substantially
curtailed  when:
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 11
(a) Pursuant  to the initial claim of exemption and satisfaction of ORS 285C.200 (1)(c), the number
of employees of the firm:
(A) Is reduced by more than 85 percent from the highest number of employees of the firm; or
(B) Has been reduced by more than 50 percent from  the highest number of employees of the firm
over two consecutive annual filing periods under ORS 285C.220 (1); or
(b) The annual average number of employees of the firm during  the first assessment year for
which the  exemption under ORS 285C.175 is granted, or any subsequently allowed year of exemption,
is reduced below the greater of:
(A) The annual  average number of employees of the firm, averaged over the 12 months preceding
the date of the application for authorization, plus one employee; or
(B) 110 percent of the annual average number of employees of the firm, averaged over the 12
months preceding the date of the application for authorization.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection, the number of employees of the
firm is the  employment of the firm, as defined in ORS 285C.200 [ (7)(b)] (8)(b), on the earlier of the
date a claim for exemption is filed under ORS 285C.220  or April 1 of the year in which the ex-
emption is initially claimed under ORS 285C.175 and following each assessment year of the ex-
emption, including after the last such assessment year.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(B) of this subsection, the annual average number of
employees of the firm is the number of  employees of the firm averaged over the course of each as-
sessment year  in which an exemption under ORS 285C.175 is allowed, using employment figures for
no fewer than four equivalent periods during the year.
(c) For the first assessment year for which an authorized business firm that qualifies under  ORS
285C.200 [(5)] (6) claims an exemption under ORS  285C.175, substantial curtailment under subsection
(1)(a)(A) or (b) of this section shall be determined by:
(A) Combining the number of employees  of the firm and the number of employees at any appli-
cable site of the firm outside the enterprise zone; and
(B) Combining the annual average  number of employees of the firm with the annual average
number of employees at any applicable site of the firm outside the enterprise zone.
(3) Operations of a business firm are not substantially curtailed under this section  during a pe-
riod of suspension as otherwise provided in ORS 285C.203.
SECTION 16.
 If Senate Bill 1507 becomes law, section 12, chapter , Oregon Laws  2026
(Enrolled Senate Bill 1507), is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  [ (1) A  credit against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed to a taxpayer for each  new job in
Oregon created by the taxpayer during the tax year. ]
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Advanced manufacturing” means activities that:
(i) Depend on the use and coordination of  information, automation, computation, soft-
ware, industrial sensors and networking;
(ii) Make use of newly developed materials and processes enabled by the physical and bi-
ological sciences, including but not limited to nanotechnology, chemistry and biology;
(iii) Involve both new ways to manufacture existing products and the manufacture of new
products emerging from new advanced technologies; or
(iv) As applied to biotechnology and life sciences activities, are related research, devel-
opment, scale-up and enabling technology  activities integral to the production of biological,
medical or biobased products.
(B) “Advanced manufacturing” does not include activities that are primarily:
(i) Routine assembly, packaging, labeling, sorting, warehousing, storage or distribution;
(ii) Basic fabrication, machining or processing that does not incorporate advanced  tech-
nologies or materially transform products or production processes;
(iii) Maintenance, repair or refurbishment of machinery, equipment or products; or
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 12
(iv) Administrative, clerical, sales, marketing or other nonproduction activities.
(b) “Clean  technology” means the manufacture or provision of, or research or develop-
ment supporting the manufacture  or provision of, products or services that enable energy
to be produced from renewable sources, that reduce negative  environmental impacts or that
reduce energy consumption.
(c) “High technology”  means software, information technology and semiconductor or re-
lated device manufacturing.
(d) “Qualified industry” means businesses that operate in any of the following sectors:
(A) Advanced manufacturing;
(B) Bioscience and biotechnology;
(C) Clean technology;
(D) Food and beverage processing;
(E) Forestry and wood products;
(F) High technology; or
(G) Outdoor gear and apparel.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise  due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed  to a taxpayer that is engaged
in a qualified industry as a primary business, for each new job in Oregon created by  the
taxpayer during the tax year in a qualified industry.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a) The credit allowed under this section shall be in the amount of $1,000  for each net
new job created by a taxpayer in the tax year,  but a taxpayer may not be certified for and may not
receive a credit for more than 10 new jobs created per tax year.
(b) In order to be considered in the determination under this section of the eligibility  and al-
lowable credit amount for any taxpayer, an employment position must have compensation that is
equal to or greater  than 150 percent of the applicable minimum wage determined under ORS 653.025.
(c) The number of net new jobs  created by the taxpayer in a tax year shall be determined by
comparing the average annual covered employment of  the taxpayer for the 12 months ending on
June 30 of the calendar year in which the taxpayer’s tax  year began and for which the credit is
sought, with the 12 months ending on June 30 of the immediately preceding calendar year.
[(3) Prior to claiming the credit allowed  under this section, a taxpayer seeking to claim the credit
is required to receive written certification of eligibility from the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment. In order  to receive certification, a taxpayer must attest that the taxpayer has created new jobs
sufficient to be eligible for the amount of credit sought, has  met the wage requirements of subsection
(2)(b) of this section and is otherwise  in compliance with this section. The certification shall indicate
the amount of the credit to which the taxpayer is entitled for the tax year. ]
(4) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer seeking to claim
the credit is required to receive written certification of eligibility from the Oregon  Business
Development Department. In order to receive certification, a taxpayer must  attest that the
taxpayer:
(a) Is engaged as the taxpayer’s primary business in a qualified industry;
(b) Has created new jobs sufficient to be eligible for the amount of credit sought; and
(c) Has met the wage requirements of subsection  (3)(b) of this section and is otherwise
in compliance with this section.
(5) The certification shall  indicate the amount of the credit to which the taxpayer is en-
titled for the tax year.
[(4)] (6) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
[(5)] (7) Any tax credit  otherwise allowable under this section that is not used by the taxpayer
in a  particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for
the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may  be
carried forward and used in  the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any credit not used in that
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 13
second succeeding tax year  may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year but
may not be carried forward for any other succeeding tax year.
[(6)] (8) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall provide information to the De-
partment of Revenue about all taxpayers that  are eligible for a tax credit under this section, if re-
quired by ORS 315.058.
[(7)] (9) Information received by the  Oregon Business Development Department pursuant to this
section may be used only for the purpose of certification and administration  of the credit. The
Oregon Business Development Department may disclose this information to entities other than the
Department of Revenue  only if the information is sufficiently aggregated or anonymized to protect
the identity and confidential information of taxpayers.
[(8)] (10) The Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department may order the suspen-
sion or revocation of a certification issued under this section, as provided in ORS 315.061.
[(9) The Oregon Business Development Department shall by rule establish: ]
[(a) The form and content of and deadlines for applications for the credit allowed under this  sec-
tion.]
[(b) Methodology for determining net new jobs created, as provided  in subsection (2) of this section,
in the instance of a merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or  acquisition affecting a tax-
payer.]
(11) The Oregon Business Development Department shall by rule:
(a) Establish the form and content of  and deadlines for applications for the credit allowed
under this section.
(b) Establish methodology for  determining net new jobs created, as provided in sub-
section (3) of this section, in the instance of  a merger, conversion, reorganization, consol-
idation or acquisition affecting a taxpayer.
(c) Further define the term “qualified industry” for purposes of this section.
SECTION 17.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4084 (HB 4084-C) Page 14